Hawaii statutes.
§46-15.6 Definitions. When used in
this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

"Premises" shall include but not be
limited to a lodging or tenement house, group residence, group living
arrangement, hotel, boardinghouse, or restaurant as further defined in section
445-90, or any other like facility serving unsupervised or unrelated
individuals.

"Public nuisances" shall include but
not be limited to the placement of structures, stalls, stands, furniture, and
containers on streets, sidewalks, and public places where the placement of
structures, stalls, stands, furniture, and containers are inconsistent with or
frustrate the purpose, function, or activity for which the street, sidewalk, or
public place was intended. [L 1987, c 333, pt of §1; am L 1994, c 171, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next